Rhode Island, session 2025, SB333.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Coverage for nutritional and other assistance.
(a) The executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) shall establish a one-year
pilot program for evidenced-based nutritional assistance and medically tailored meals, groceries
and produce prescriptions to include, but not be limited to, fruit and vegetable prescriptions or
vouchers provided by medical professionals for individuals with diet-related diseases or food
insecurity, clinical nutrition education, and other interventions for certain beneficiaries where there
is a clinical need. This program shall seek to receive expanded authority to provide these services
when medically appropriate.
(b) The services established in subsection (a) of this section shall be available to individuals
with three (3) or more chronic, diet-related health conditions, for a period of up to six (6) months.
There shall be two (2) randomized cohorts of participants, and each cohort shall have a minimum
of one hundred and forty-two (142) participants. The first cohort shall receive the services
established in subsection (a) of this section for six (6) months total, and at the end of the six (6)
months the first cohort shall end services and then the second cohort shall begin to receive the
services established in subsection (a) of this section for six (6) months total.
(c) Dependent on funding availability, the state may provide additional grocery support for
other members of the covered individual’s household.

(d) The EOHHS shall ensure that federal financial participation is used to the maximum
extent allowable to provide coverage pursuant to this section, and that state-only funds shall be
used only if federal financial participation is not available. To the extent the EOHHS determines it
necessary to implement the provisions of this section, the EOHHS is authorized to pursue a
Medicaid § 1115 (42 U.S.C. § 1315) demonstration waiver request and renewal to seek a waiver of
the compliance provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(a) ("definitions")
(e) The EOHHS shall prepare a report and submit it to the general assembly three (3)
months after the conclusion of the pilot program. The report shall include health outcomes, cost-
effectiveness, impacts on food insecurity, and other individual or household benefits, as well as a
fiscal analysis and a recommendation outlining the benefits and costs of expanding the pilot
program throughout the state. This section shall sunset and the pilot program shall expire July 1,
2027.
(f) The general assembly shall include the amount of one million five hundred thousand
dollars ($1,500,000) in general revenue funding in the fiscal year 2026 appropriation to the EOHHS
for the pilot program set forth in this section. Any unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year
shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made available for the same program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall sunset and expire on July 1,
2027.
========
LC001069
========
LC001069 - Page 2 of 3